Utah statutes.
61-2c-509.   Disciplinary actions.
(1)  This part does not limit the authority of the director or commission to
take disciplinary action against a licensee for a violation of:
(a)  this chapter; or
(b)  rules made by the division under this chapter.
(2)  The repayment in full of all obligations to the fund by a licensee does
not nullify or modify the effect of a disciplinary proceeding brought under:
(a)  this chapter; or
(b)  rules made by the division under this chapter.
